North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article VII Local Government

§ 1. General Assembly to provide for local government.

The General Assembly shall provide for the organization and government and the fixing of boundaries of counties, cities and towns, and other governmental subdivisions, and, except as otherwise prohibited by this Constitution, may give such powers and duties to counties, cities and towns, and other governmental subdivisions as it may deem advisable.

The General Assembly shall not incorporate as a city or town, nor shall it authorize to be incorporated as a city or town, any territory lying within one mile of the corporate limits of any other city or town having a population of 5,000 or more according to the most recent decennial census of population taken by order of Congress, or lying within three miles of the corporate limits of any other city or town having a population of 10,000 or more according to the most recent decennial census of population taken by order of Congress, or lying within four miles of the corporate limits of any other city or town having a population of 25,000 or more according to the most recent decennial census of population taken by order of Congress, or lying within five miles of the corporate limits of any other city or town having a population of 50,000 or more according to the most recent decennial census of population taken by order of Congress. Notwithstanding the foregoing limitations, the General Assembly may incorporate a city or town by an act adopted by vote of three-fifths of all the members of each house.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 1971, c. 857, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of the first paragraph of this section are similar to those of Art. VIII, § 4, Const. 1868, as amended in 1916.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on local legislation in the General Assembly, discussing this section, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 340 (1967).

For note on the expansion of standing in North Carolina taxpayers’ actions, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 126 (1979).

For comment discussing North Carolina’s unilateral annexation statutes, see 19 Wake Forest L. Rev. 215 (1983).

For 1984 survey, “Competitive Annexation Among Municipalities: North Carolina Adopts the Prior Jurisdiction Rule,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1260 (1985).

For article, “Bargain Basement Annexation: How Municipalities Subvert the Intent of North Carolina Annexation Laws,” see 29 N.C. Cent. L.J. 77 (2006).

For article, “Toward a Comprehensive Program for Regulating Vacant or Abandoned Dwellings in North Carolina: The General Police Power, Minimum Housing Standards, and Vacant Property Registration,” see 32 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (2009).

For article, “Searching Everywhere for a Section 24(1)(A) Standard:
City of Asheville, Town of Boone, and the Unclear Future of Local-State Relations in North Carolina,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 1882 (2018).

§ 2. Sheriffs.

In each county a Sheriff shall be elected by the qualified voters thereof at the same time and places as members of the General Assembly are elected and shall hold his office for a period of four years, subject to removal for cause as provided by law. No person is eligible to serve as Sheriff if that person has been convicted of a felony against this State, the United States, or another state, whether or not that person has been restored to the rights of citizenship in the manner prescribed by law. Convicted of a felony includes the entry of a plea of guilty; a verdict or finding of guilt by a jury, judge, magistrate, or other adjudicating body, tribunal, or official, either civilian or military; or a plea of no contest, nolo contendere, or the equivalent.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 2010-49, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to sheriffs, see

G.S. 162-1

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. VII, § 5, Const. 1868, as amended in 1962.

Defeated Amendment Proposal.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1985, c. 768, ss. 9.1(2) and (10), and defeated at the primary election held on May 6, 1986, would have amended this section by inserting “except in 1988 at the same time and places as members of the United States House of Representatives are elected” following “General Assembly are enacted,” and by adding “except that those elected in 1986 or 1988 shall serve for terms of five years” at the end of the section.

§ 3. Merged or consolidated counties.

Any unit of local government formed by the merger or consolidation of a county or counties and the cities and towns therein shall be deemed both a county and a city for the purposes of this Constitution, and may exercise any authority conferred by law on counties, or on cities and towns, or both, as the General Assembly may provide.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.